Hawaii statutes.
§23G-3 General purposes of bureau. The
purpose of the office of the legislative reference bureau shall be to:

(1) Provide a comprehensive research and reference
service on legislative problems for the legislature;

(2) Conduct impartial research, including legal
research, as may be necessary for the enactment of substantive legislation,
upon request by the legislature, legislative committees, or legislators, or on
its own initiative;

(3) Disseminate its research findings to the
legislature on all research projects undertaken upon the request of the
legislature or legislative committees;

(4) Secure reports of various officers and boards of
the State and as far as may be of the states and of the other territories of
the United States and such other material, periodicals, or books as will
furnish the fullest information practicable upon all matters pertaining to
current or proposed legislative problems;

(5) Secure information for the legislature,
legislative committees, and legislators by cooperating with the legislative
reference services in the states and with the legislative service conference
maintained by the council of state governments;

(6) Maintain a reference library for use by the
legislature and legislative service agencies. Subject to the priorities
established by the director, reference materials may be made available to the
various departments and agencies of the State and the general public;

(7) Draft or aid in drafting bills, resolutions,
memorials, and amendments thereto, including committee reports, for the
legislature, legislative committees, and legislators when requested;

(8) Control and maintain the operations of any
legislative data processing program as may be established;

(9) Serve, upon request, in an advisory capacity to
the legislature and its committees on all matters within its competencies and
responsibilities;

(10) Assist, upon request, legislative service
agencies on matters within its competency;

(11) Perform the function of statute revision and
publication of session laws, supplements, and replacement volumes; and

(12) Maintain the public access room established by
chapter 21G. [L 1972, c 171, pt of §2; am L Sp 1977 1st, c 8, §2; am L 1996, c
174, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next